Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1401.13
Distributor, defined.

Distributor means
a person, resident or nonresident of this state, who, in whole or in part,
sells or distributes new motor vehicles, trailers, or motorcycles to dealers
or who maintains distributors or representatives who sell or distribute motor
vehicles, trailers, or motorcycles to dealers and also has the same meaning
as the term franchisor.

Laws 2010, LB816, § 25.